California, session 20252026, AB2738.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18944.41 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18944.41. Sections 18944.30, 18944.31, 18944.33, 18944.35, and 18944.40 shall become inoperative when building standards become effective after approval by the California Building Standards Commission pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) that permit the construction of structures that use construction using baled straw as a loadbearing or nonloadbearing material and that are is safe to the public.